Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-915.01
Provisional ballot; required; when.

Any person who votes in an election for federal office as a result of a federal or state court order or any other order extending the time established for closing the polls pursuant to a state law in effect ten days before the date of that election may only vote in that election by casting a provisional ballot as described in section 32-915.

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 25.